apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>èr</l>        <r>ér</r></p><i></i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ér</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gr">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>gr</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>égr</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abr/é[G]er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i></i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>é</i><par n="abrég/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i></i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>e</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="r/i[]re__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i</i><par n="ri/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="maud/i[]re__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i</i><par n="maudi/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lu/i[]re__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i></i><par n="luî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i</i><par n="lui/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/i[]re__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i</i><par n="di/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="contred/i[]re__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i</i><par n="contredi/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="concl/u[]re__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>û</l>         <r>u</r></p><i></i><par n="dî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>u</i><par n="conclu/re__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__v">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i>v</i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ev</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__t">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i>t</i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>et</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__s">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i>s</i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>es</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__n">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i>n</i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>en</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__m">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i>m</i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>em</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__l">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>e</r></p><i>l</i><par n="achèt/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>el</i><par n="achet/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__cr">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>cr</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>écr</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__tr">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>tr</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>étr</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__m">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>m</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ém</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__t">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>t</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ét</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__s">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>s</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>és</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__r">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>r</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ér</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__qu">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>qu</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>équ</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__n">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>n</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>én</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__l">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>l</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>él</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gu">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>gu</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>égu</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gn">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>gn</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>égn</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gl">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>gl</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>égl</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__d">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>d</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>éd</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__ch">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>ch</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>éch</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__br">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>br</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ébr</i><par n="accélér/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abr/é[G]er__vblex__g">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>é</r></p><i>g</i><par n="abrèg/e__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>ég</i><par n="abrég/er__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="about/[]ir__vblex__">
  <e>       <p><l>î</l>         <r>i</r></p><i></i><par n="aboutî/mes__vblex"/></e>
  <e>       <i>i</i><par n="abouti/r__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="acheter">         <i>ach</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__t"/></e>
<e lm="aléser">          <i>al</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__s"/></e>
<e lm="alléger">         <i>all</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex__g"/></e>
<e lm="assiéger" a="eleka"><i>assi</i><par n="abr/é[G]er__vblex__g"/></e>
<e lm="blasphémer">      <i>blasph</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__m"/></e>
<e lm="célébrer">        <i>cél</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__br"/></e>
<e lm="concéder">        <i>conc</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__d"/></e>
<e lm="concélébrer">     <i>concél</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__br"/></e>
<e lm="congeler">        <i>cong</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__l"/></e>
<e lm="corréler">        <i>corr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__l"/></e>
<e lm="décréter" a="eleka"><i>décr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__t"/></e>
<e lm="déféquer">        <i>déf</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__qu"/></e>
<e lm="déléguer" a="webform"><i>dél</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gu"/></e>
<e lm="démanteler">      <i>démant</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__l"/></e>
<e lm="déposséder">      <i>déposs</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__d"/></e>
<e lm="désintégrer">     <i>désint</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gr"/></e>
<e lm="dire des gros mots"><i>d</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex__"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>gros<b/>mots</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>gros<b/>mots</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="dire oui">        <i>d</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex__"/><p><l><b/>oui</l><r><g><b/>oui</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="disséquer">       <i>diss</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__qu"/></e>
<e lm="enlever">         <i>enl</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__v"/></e>
<e lm="ensevelir">       <i>ensevel</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex__"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="altérer" a="eleka"><i>alt</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__r"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="suffire à"><i>suff</i><par n="lu/i[]re__vblex__"/><p><l><b/>à</l><r><g><j/>à_por<s n="pr"/></g></r></p></e>
<e lm="exclure">         <i>excl</i><par n="concl/u[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="exécrer">         <i>ex</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__cr"/></e>
<e lm="fréter" a="eleka"><i>fr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__t"/></e>
<e lm="gangréner">       <i>gangr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__n"/></e>
<e lm="geler" a="eleka"> <i>g</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__l"/></e>
<e lm="héler">           <i>h</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__l"/></e>
<e lm="hypothéquer" a="eleka"><i>hypoth</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__qu"/></e>
<e lm="imprégner">       <i>impr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gn"/></e>
<e lm="intégrer">        <i>int</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gr"/></e>
<e lm="interdire">       <i>interd</i><par n="contred/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="lécher">          <i>l</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__ch"/></e>
<e lm="léguer">          <i>l</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gu"/></e>
<e lm="léser" a="eleka"> <i>l</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__s"/></e>
 <e lm="luire">                                    <i>lu</i><par n="lu/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="maudire">         <i>maud</i><par n="maud/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="médire">          <i>méd</i><par n="contred/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="mener">           <i>m</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__n"/></e>
<e lm="opérer">          <i>op</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__r"/></e>
<e lm="oxygéner">        <i>oxyg</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__n"/></e>
<e lm="paramétrer">      <i>param</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__tr"/></e>
<e lm="pénétrer profondément"><i>pén</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__tr"/><p><l><b/>profondément</l><r><g><b/>profondément</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="peser">           <i>p</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__s"/></e>
<e lm="précéder">        <i>préc</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__d"/></e>
<e lm="prédire">         <i>préd</i><par n="contred/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="promener">        <i>prom</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__n"/></e>
<e lm="racheter">        <i>rach</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__t"/></e>
<e lm="régler">          <i>r</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gl"/></e>
<e lm="régler d'avance"> <i>r</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gl"/><p><l><b/>d'avance</l><r><g><b/>d'avance</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="régner">          <i>r</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gn"/></e>
<e lm="réintégrer">      <i>réint</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gr"/></e>
<e lm="réinterpréter">   <i>réinterpr</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__t"/></e>
<e lm="réjouir">         <i>réjou</i><par n="about/[]ir__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="reléguer">        <i>rel</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gu"/></e>
<e lm="relever">         <i>rel</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__v"/></e>
<e lm="révéler">         <i>rév</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__l"/></e>
<e lm="rire aux éclats"> <i>r</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex__"/><p><l><b/>aux<b/>éclats</l><r><g><b/>aux<b/>éclats</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sécher">          <i>s</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__ch"/></e>
<e lm="semer">           <i>s</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__m"/></e>
<e lm="sourire">         <i>sour</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="suffire">         <i>suff</i><par n="lu/i[]re__vblex__"/></e>
<e lm="vénérer">         <i>vén</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__r"/></e>
<e lm="zébrer">          <i>z</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__br"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dire non"> <i>d</i><par n="d/i[]re__vblex__"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>non</l><r><g><b/>non</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="promener son regard"><i>prom</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__n"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>son<b/>regard</l><r><g><b/>son<b/>regard</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="pénétrer profondément"><i>pén</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__tr"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>profondément</l><r><g><b/>profondément</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="régler d'avance"><i>r</i><par n="accél/é[R]er__vblex__gl"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>d'avance</l><r><g><b/>d'avance</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="rire aux éclats"><i>r</i><par n="r/i[]re__vblex__"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>aux<b/>éclats</l><r><g><b/>aux<b/>éclats</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="relever de ses fonctions"><i>rel</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex__v"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>de<b/>ses<b/>fonctions</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>ses<b/>fonctions</g></r></p></e>
